North Dakota statutes. TITLE 49 Public Utilities
CHAPTER 49-22 Energy Conversion and Transmission Facility Siting Act
49-22-16.
Effect of issuance of certificate or permit — Local land use, zoning, or building rules, regulations, or ordinances — State agency rules.

The issuance of a certificate of site compatibility or a route permit shall, subject to subsections 2 and 3, be the sole site or route approval required to be obtained by the utility.

A certificate of site compatibility for an electric energy conversion facility may not supersede or preempt any local land use, zoning, or building rules, regulations, or ordinances and a site may not be designated which violates local land use, zoning, or building rules, regulations, or ordinances.

Utilities subject to this chapter shall obtain state permits that may be required to construct and operate electric energy conversion facilities and electric transmission facilities. A state agency in processing a utility’s facility permit application shall be bound to the decisions of the commission with respect to the site designation for the electric energy conversion facility or the corridor or route designation for the electric transmission facility and with respect to other matters for which authority has been granted to the commission by this chapter.

A site or route may not be designated which violates the rules of a state agency. A state agency with jurisdiction over any aspect of a proposed facility shall present the position of the agency at least thirty days before the public hearing on an application for a certificate, a permit, or a waiver, which position clearly must state whether the site, corridor, or route being considered for designation will be in compliance with the agency’s rules. For purposes of this chapter it is presumed a proposed facility will be in compliance with a state agency’s rules if the agency fails to present its position on the proposed site, corridor, or route at least thirty days before the appropriate public hearing.

A permit for the construction of an electric transmission facility within a designated corridor supersedes and preempts a local land use, zoning, or building rule, regulation, or ordinance, upon a finding by the commission that the rule, regulation, or ordinance, as applied to the proposed route, is unreasonably restrictive in view of existing technology, factors of cost or economics, or needs of consumers regardless of location. Without such a finding by the commission, a route may not be designated which violates a local land use, zoning, or building rule, regulation, or ordinance.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 16; 1979, ch. 504, § 11; 2017, ch. 327, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 328, § 17, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 389, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 56, § 6, effective July 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 49-22-16 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 88, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2038; and Section 6 of Chapter 56, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 1383.

Section 49-22-16 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 327, Session Law 2017, Senate Bill 2286; and Section 17 of Chapter 328, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1144.

49-22-16.1.
Unfair tactics in acquiring land or easements for a facility — Court action — Cancellation of easement — Penalty.

Any person employed by a public utility to acquire easements for a facility subject to this chapter shall not use any harassment, threat, intimidation, misrepresentation, deception, fraud, or other unfair tactics to induce the owner of the land to be affected by the facility to grant or agree to any easements.

If at least five landowners aggrieved by the conduct of a person or persons, acting on behalf of the same utility, acquiring easements for a site or route of a facility allege use of harassment, threat, intimidation, misrepresentation, deception, fraud, or other unfair tactics by the person or persons acquiring or attempting to acquire the easement, an action may be brought in the appropriate district court.

Upon a determination by the court that the person or persons employed by the utility used harassment, threat, intimidation, misrepresentation, deception, fraud, or other unfair tactics in acquiring or attempting to acquire an easement from at least five separate landowners, the court shall, by order, declare the easements void and may order any compensation paid therefor returned to the offending utility, or allow the landowner to retain such compensation, or award to the landowner up to three times the amount of the compensation involved as damages, punitive or compensatory. The court shall award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiffs when the court rules in favor of the plaintiffs.

Upon a determination by the court that the utility involved did knowingly allow, encourage, or operate in active consort or participation with such person or persons utilizing such unfair tactic, the court shall cause a copy of its memorandum opinion or order to be filed with the commission.

Upon receiving a copy of a memorandum opinion or order issued by a district court pursuant to this section, the commission may revoke or suspend the permit issued with respect to the route affecting the aggrieved landowners. If a permit has not been issued with respect to a site or route affecting the aggrieved landowners, the commission may refuse to issue a permit for such portion of the route.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 448, § 1.

49-22-16.2.
Easements for a facility — Terms.

Any easement for an electric transmission facility as defined in this chapter acquired contractually by a utility after July 1, 1979, shall give the landowner the option of receiving a single sum payment for the easement or receiving payment in annual installments of equal amounts including interest on the outstanding balance to be paid by the utility at a rate equal to the average rate paid during that year by the Bank of North Dakota on a certificate of deposit in an amount equal to the outstanding balance. The first annual installments shall be prorated to July first and all following annual installments shall fall due on July first. The option provided herein shall not apply to any easement providing for compensation of less than five thousand dollars. In the event the landowner elects to receive the compensation in annual payments, the benefits unpaid at the time of sale of the real estate to which the easement attaches shall accrue to the purchaser of said real estate thereafter. The utility right-of-way agent shall inform the property owner of the owner’s option to choose annual installments.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 505, § 1.

49-22-16.3.
Route adjustment before or during construction for gas or liquid transmission line. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 365, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 328, § 27, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22-16.4.
Light-mitigating technology system — Rules.

The commission shall adopt rules by January 1, 2019, relating to the implementation of light-mitigating technology systems on wind energy conversion facilities. The rules must be consistent with the federal aviation administration regulations [14 CFR 1.1 et seq.] and must include service and maintenance requirements, safety standards, and lighting system requirements.

By December 31, 2019, every wind energy conversion facility for which the commission issued a certificate of site compatibility after June 5, 2016, must be equipped with a functioning light-mitigating technology system that complies with rules adopted by the commission. After public hearing, the commission may grant a waiver or an extension of time based on technical or economic feasibility considerations.

By December 31, 2021, every wind energy conversion facility for which the commission issued a certificate of site compatibility before June 5, 2016, must be equipped with a functioning light-mitigating technology system that complies with the rules adopted by the commission. After public hearing, the commission may grant a waiver or an extension of time based on technical or economic feasibility considerations.

Any costs associated with the implementation, operation, and maintenance of light-mitigating technology systems are the sole responsibility of the wind energy conversion facility owner.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 329, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 346, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

49-22-17.
Improvement of sites or locations.

Utilities that have acquired an electric energy conversion facility site or electric transmission line route in accordance with the provisions of this chapter may proceed to construct or improve such site or route for the intended purposes at any time, subject to subsections 2 and 3 of section 49-22-16; provided, that if such construction and improvement commences more than four years after a certificate or permit for the site or route has been issued, then the utility must certify to the commission that such site or route continues to meet the conditions upon which the certificate of site compatibility or electric transmission facility construction permit was issued.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 17; 2017, ch. 328, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22-18.
Rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and to prescribe methods and procedures required therewith.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 18; 1979, ch. 504, § 12.

49-22-19.
Hearing — Judicial review.

Any party aggrieved by the issuance of a certificate of site compatibility or electric transmission facility construction permit from the commission, certification of continuing suitability filed by a utility with the commission, or promulgation of a final order by the commission, may request a rehearing by the commission. The hearing must be conducted pursuant to chapter 28-32. There is a right of appeal to the district court from any adverse ruling by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 19; 1977, ch. 447, § 13; 2017, ch. 328, § 19, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22-20.
Revocation or suspension of certificate or permit.

A certificate of site compatibility or permit for the construction of an electric transmission facility may be revoked or suspended for:

Any material false statement in the application or in accompanying statements or studies required of the applicant.

Failure to comply with the certificate or permit or any terms, conditions, or modifications contained therein.

Violation of the provisions of this chapter or rules or regulations issued pursuant to this chapter by the commission.

A determination by a district court pursuant to section 49-22-16.1.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 20; 1977, ch. 448, § 2; 2017, ch. 328, § 20, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22-21.
Penalties.

Any person required by this chapter to have a certificate or permit who willfully begins construction of an electric energy conversion facility or electric transmission facility without previously securing a certificate or permit as prescribed by this chapter, or who willfully constructs, operates, or maintains an electric energy conversion facility or electric transmission facility other than in compliance with the certificate or permit and any terms, conditions, and modifications contained therein is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Any person who willfully violates any regulation issued or approved pursuant to this chapter or who willfully falsifies, tampers with, or renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this chapter shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Any person who willfully engages in any of the following conduct is subject to a civil penalty of not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each such violation for each day the violations persist, except that the maximum penalty may not exceed two hundred thousand dollars for any related series of violations:

Begins construction of an electric energy conversion facility or an electric transmission facility without having been issued a certificate or permit pursuant to this chapter.

Constructs, operates, or maintains an electric energy conversion facility or an electric transmission facility other than in compliance with the certificate or permit and any terms, conditions, or modifications contained therein.

Violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

Falsifies, tampers with, or renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained pursuant to a certificate or permit issued pursuant to this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commission, by injunctive procedures, without bond or other undertaking, may proceed against any person who willfully engages in any conduct described in subsection 3. No liability shall accrue to the commission or its authorized representative in proceeding against any person pursuant to this section.

The civil penalty provided for in this subsection may be compromised by the commission. The amount of the penalty when finally determined or agreed upon in compromise must be deposited in the general fund and, if not paid, may be recovered in a civil action in the courts of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 21; 1977, ch. 447, § 14; 1979, ch. 504, § 13; 1985, ch. 518, § 1; 2017, ch. 328, § 21, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

False information in governmental matters, penalty, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-11-02.

49-22-22.
Siting process expense recovery — Deposit in special fund — Continuing appropriation.

Every applicant under this chapter shall pay to the commission an application fee:

An applicant for a certificate of site compatibility shall pay an amount equal to five hundred dollars for each one million dollars of investment in the facility.

An applicant for a certificate of corridor compatibility shall pay an amount equal to five thousand dollars for each one million dollars of investment in the facility.

An applicant for a waiver shall pay the amount which would be required for an application for a certificate of site or corridor compatibility for the proposed facility. If a waiver is not granted for a proposed facility, such application fee paid shall be allowed as a credit against fees payable under this section in connection with an application under this chapter for a certificate or permit for the proposed facility.

An applicant requesting an amendment to a certificate or permit or for a transfer of a certificate or permit shall pay an amount to be determined by the commission to cover anticipated expenses of processing the application.

An applicant certifying to the commission under subsection 3 of section 49-22-03 shall pay an amount to be determined by the commission to cover anticipated expenses of processing the application.

The application fee under subdivision a, b, or c may not be less than ten thousand dollars nor more than one hundred thousand dollars.

If an application fee is less than twenty-five thousand dollars, an applicant may agree to pay additional fees that are reasonably necessary for completion of the site, corridor, or route evaluation and designation process.

At the request of the commission and with the approval of the emergency commission, the applicant shall pay such additional fees as are reasonably necessary for completion of the electric energy conversion facility site, electric transmission facility corridor, or electric transmission facility route evaluation and designation process by the commission. The application fee under subsection 1 and any additional fees required of the applicant under this subsection may not exceed an amount equal to one thousand dollars for each one million dollars of investment in a proposed energy conversion facility or ten thousand dollars for each one million dollars of investment in a proposed electric transmission facility.

A siting process expense recovery fund is established in the state treasury. The commission shall deposit payments received under subsections 1 and 2 in the siting process expense recovery fund. All moneys deposited in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the commission to pay expenses incurred in the siting process. The commission shall specify the time and method of payment of any fees and shall refund the portion of fees collected under subsections 1 and 2 which exceeds the expenses incurred for the evaluation and designation process.

Every applicant under this chapter shall pay to the commission an administrative fee equal to one hundred dollars for each one million dollars of original investment, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars. The administrative fee must be deposited in the public service commission program fund.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 22; 1977, ch. 447, § 15; 1979, ch. 504, § 14; 2005, ch. 404, § 1; 2011, ch. 348, § 2; 2015, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 328, §§
22, 23, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 8, § 7, effective May 3, 2021; 2021, ch. 347, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 326, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2005 amendment of this section applies retroactively to fees paid after August 1, 2004.

Section 49-22-22 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 7 of Chapter 8, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1008; and Section 4 of Chapter 347, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1096.

49-22-23.
Transfer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 447, § 16.

49-22-24.
Safety.

Every utility that owns or operates electric generation of any size for the primary purpose of resale shall comply with the standards of the national electrical safety code in effect at the time of construction of the generation.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 412, § 1.

49-22-25.
Approval for temporary operation or variance.

The commission may approve temporary operation of facilities or a temporary variance from approved construction, operation, or maintenance of facilities upon a showing of good cause and receipt of a utility certification that the activities will have no adverse impacts upon the welfare of the citizens of this state or the environment.

The commission may issue a temporary approval or variance without the necessity of notice, publication, or public hearing with any additional terms, conditions, or modifications deemed necessary to minimize impacts.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 347, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

49-22-26.
Protection of cultural or historic site data.

The commission may limit access to, and release of, information that contains data that specifically identifies the location of cultural, archaeological, historical, or paleontological sites.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 347, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.